Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1650
Violation; penalty.

Any entity or any owner, officer, agent, or employee thereof who willfully violates section 85-1610 or willfully fails or refuses to deposit with the department the records required by section 85-1644 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day's failure to comply with such sections shall be a separate violation.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 55;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 49;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2855;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 50.